Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-221.01
County fairs; joint fairs; permitted.

The boards of county agricultural societies and county fair boards of two or more adjoining counties may hold joint fairs at one location. Such authority shall not disturb their right to purchase, hold, and improve real estate for that purpose, to convey the same, to levy and collect taxes for such purposes, and to do all things necessary for the proper management of such joint county fairs.

Laws 1965, c. 5, § 1, p. 75;

Laws 1999, LB 437, § 2.